Louisiana, session 2026, HB271.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XIV of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:410.21, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XIV. LOUISIANA COMMISSION ON FOUNDATIONAL EDUCATION
§410.21. Louisiana Commission on Foundational Education
A. The Louisiana Commission on Foundational Education, referred to in this
Section as the "commission", is hereby created for the purpose of evaluating and
making recommendations to improve foundational education policy.
B. The commission has the following powers and duties:
(1) To serve as an advisory body to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education and the state Department of Education on matters relating to
foundational literacy, numeracy, and family engagement from kindergarten through
grade eight.
(2) To research and analyze all policies, regulations, procedures, and funding
structures relative to the implementation of foundational education initiatives,
reforms, and instructional practices.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 271 ENROLLED
(3) To request, receive, and review state, regional, and national data
necessary to determine and understand the effectiveness and impact of foundational
education initiatives, instructional strategies, and student outcomes.
(4) To develop and formulate policy, programmatic, and instructional
recommendations aligned with evidence-based practices, including but not limited
to literacy practices consistent with the science of reading and research-based
mathematics and numeracy instruction.
(5) To recommend strategies to strengthen family engagement and promote
alignment from prekindergarten through eighth grade to ensure kindergarten
readiness and continuity in foundational skill development.
(6) To establish subcommittees or working groups to identify, analyze, and
develop recommendations in areas deemed appropriate by the commission. Such
subcommittees or working groups shall report to the commission and may include
commission members and individuals with relevant subject-matter expertise who are
not commission members.
C. The commission consists of the following members:
(1) One member appointed by the governor.
(2) One member appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) One member appointed by the president of the Senate.
(4) The state superintendent of education or his designee.
(5) One member appointed by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(6) One member appointed by the commissioner of higher education.
(7) The secretary of Louisiana Works or his designee.
(8) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development or his designee.
(9) One member from the Louisiana Parent Teacher Association appointed
by the president of the association.
(10) One member from the Louisiana Association for the Education of
Young Children appointed by the executive director of the association.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 271 ENROLLED
(11) One currently employed classroom teacher or expert in literacy
instruction appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(12) One currently employed classroom teacher or expert in numeracy and
mathematics instruction appointed by the state superintendent of education.
(13) One currently serving parish or city school superintendent appointed by
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(14) The chief executive of Decoding Dyslexia Louisiana, or his designee.
(15) One member from the Louisiana Association of Business and Industry
appointed by the president of the association.
(16) One member from the Pelican Institute for Public Policy appointed by
the chief executive officer of the institute.
(17) One member from a national nonprofit organization with demonstrated
experience advising states on comprehensive education reform and evidence-based
academic standards, appointed by the governor.
(18) One member from the Southeastern Louisiana University College of
Education appointed by the dean of the college.
(19) One member from the Center for Literacy and Learning appointed by
the president of the center.
(20) One member from the Louisiana Policy Institute for Children appointed
by the chief executive officer of the institute.
(21) One member from Leaders for a Better Louisiana appointed by the chief
executive officer.
(22) One direct provider with a membership in the Child Care Association
of Louisiana appointed by the board of directors of the association.
D.(1) Members appointed pursuant to Paragraphs (C)(1) through (C)(8) of
this Section shall serve for the duration of their respective terms of office or for a
term concurrent with the term of the appointing authority, as applicable.
(2) Members listed in Paragraphs (C)(9) through (C)(22) of this Section shall
serve three-year terms, except that for initial terms, such members shall serve
staggered terms as follows:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 271 ENROLLED
(a) Members listed in Paragraphs (C)(9) through (C)(12) of this Section
shall serve an initial term of one year.
(b) Members listed in Paragraphs (C)(13) through (C)(16) of this Section
shall serve an initial term of two years.
(c) Members listed in Paragraphs (C)(17) through (C)(22) of this Section
shall serve an initial term of three years.
(3) Any appointed member may be removed for cause by the appointing
authority.
(4) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original selection.
E.(1) The state superintendent of education shall call the initial meeting no
later than September 15, 2026.
(2) The commission shall elect a chair and vice chair.
(3) The commission shall meet at least quarterly and at such other times as
determined necessary by the chair.
(4) Eight members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
(5) An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be
required for any official action.
(6) All meetings shall comply with the provisions of the Open Meetings
Law, R.S. 42:11 et seq.
(7) Members of the commission shall serve without compensation except per
diem or expenses reimbursement to which they may be individually entitled as
members of their constituent organizations.
F. The state Department of Education shall provide staff support to the
commission and shall provide for the records of the Louisiana Literacy Advisory
Commission to be transferred to the commission.
G. Not later than February fifteenth annually, the commission shall submit
a written report of its findings and recommendations and the status of the
implementation of its recommendations to the House Committee on Education, the
Senate Committee on Education, the governor, and the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 271 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 36:651(F)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§651. Transfer of boards, commissions, departments, and agencies to Department
of Education; boards, commissions, and agencies within Department of
Education
* * *
F. The following agencies are transferred to and hereafter shall be within the
Department of Education as provided in R.S. 36:901 et seq.:
* * *
(8) The Louisiana Literacy Advisory Commission (R.S. 17:410.11). The
Louisiana Commission on Foundational Education (R.S. 17:410.21).
* * *
Section 3. Part XIII of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:410.11, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.